Utah statutes.
15-10-202.   Remedy for violation.

(1)  Subject to Subsection (2), if a seller does not comply with Section 15-10-201 with respect to a service contract containing an automatic renewal provision:

(a)  the automatic renewal provision is void and unconscionable as a matter of public policy; and

(b)  the service contract shall automatically renew on a month-to-month basis.

(2)  Subsection (1) applies to an automatic renewal provision in a service contract with a business consumer for which a seller does not comply with Section 15-10-201 only if the service contract is executed on or after July 1, 2011.



Amended by Chapter 262, 2011 General Session

